
                   So I didn't have a problem with, yes her class was boring and her projects were long and boring and she graded tough but it was a class that was pretty easy to pass as long as you did the work. Until she gave me a 0 on my final (the one I was exempt from) which brought my grade from a A to a B. Don't trust her exemption policy.
                
                   Don't, just don't
                
                   Professor Becker is pretty new to the campus (either 1st or 2nd year). She is a nice person and her class isn't hard to pass. There is a lot of work and she is a hard grader but it's easy to get an A by going to class and getting your work done. TONS of group projects (group grades not individual grades).
                
                   She is a great professor! You have group projects and other projects you have to do, but they are enjoyable! Her lectures are fun, and the interaction you get in class is great! All in all, she is a wonderful professor and a fun class! 
                
                   Mrs. Baum is an amazing teacher. She was my only class on Friday, and I actually didn't mind going to it. Mrs. Baum really cares about her students and makes class time interesting, fun, and fresh. Not many test are given and she assigns group projects quite often. She is one of the best teachers I have had. Take her class; she is the BOMB :)
                
                   Fantastic class with a great prof! Took online during the summer. If you are willing to read the text book and participate in the discussion boards you shouldn't really have any issues with acing this course.
                
                   She's the best! Absolutely love her. The class was interesting and very interactive. You have the chance to create "passports" to use while taking exams. I wouldn't call this class an easy A but if you go to class and participate its hard to fail.
                
                   This professor is very knowledgeable but is also not as involved in the class as she could be. She has a graduate student do all of her grading so she does not see majority of your wok and she also assigns a lot of unnecessary busy work. I would not recommend taking this class with a heavy class load because it could potentially be overwhelming.
                
                   Wasn't clear on what the class's topic was actually about because it was definitely not Organizational Communication, it was an educational class about race, gender, and politics or whatever off-topic we were on that day. On the bright side, she's very polite, politically correct, and will help you. JUST GO TO CLASS.
                
                   This was my online class, and I loved it. Learned so much and would recommend it to anyone.
                
                   Hands down my favorite class of the semester. Wonderful lady who will truly make you love communications. Don't blow the class off, really engage, and you will be absolutely fine. One of the best professors I've had and always ready to help with any questions. Don't take anyone else for communications!
                
                   Sweetest woman you will ever meet! Take her class! It is beyond easy, she is very interesting, has an amazing life. This was the class I dreaded the most and I loved it. Assignments are easy and she grades easier. She's inspiring. Assignments are very interesting you will gain a new perspective.
                
                   I was not excited to take the basic speech class, but Mrs. Gregory was a great teacher! She is so nice and understanding. You should do well as long as you show up to class and try your best. She is very easy and fair when grading the speeches. You can tell she really wants everyone to succeed.
                
                   Great professor. Best syllabus ever, you'll know exactly what you're going to do each day. Gives 14 quizzes one for each chapter of the book, however they're incredibly easy. Cool guy, easy class.
                
                   Easy class , it's your simple business speech class. Not tiny chat homework and test are easy! I recommend you take him 
                
                   Dr. Hanson is very passionate about what she does and she cares about her students. Since it was a class that only meets once a week, she didn't have time to explain the information fully, so the group projects were a bit confusing. Read all assigned material. She gives listening quizzes over them. Ask many questions and pay attention.
                
                   Dr. Hanson truly cares about her students. Great professor.
                
                   knows her material, uses pop culture examples often to explain concepts which was cool and helpful. very committed to her students.
                
                   Cares about students...one of the best teachers i've ever had! ~ One of the best in the SCOM department!
                
                   Connie McKee makes this course fun! The material itself is a lot to handle but she does her best to help everyone out and make it as clear as possible. The tests are still tough but if you need help she will be there to help you along. I definitely recommend taking Connie's class if you have to take this course.
                
                   She is a good teacher and coach, I would recommend her class.
                
                   Wonderful professor! She truly cares about all of her students! Connie is by far my favorite professor at WT!
                
                   She is awesome and fun. Makes us work very hard to get the job dont but allows us to have fun as well. And a debate team would be VERY fun at WT
                
                   she is an excellent coach and teacher demanding that students be up to par and at the same time willing to spend the time to help them meet that demand.
                
                   McKee is overwhelming...she talks and talks, but no one knows what she is getting at. That's okay, b/c I'm one of her favorites and that's what is important.
                
                   Ms. McKee is a fruit...she flies off the handle and has power issues. She does not act professional!
                
                   I had her at AHS and she was a really good teacher
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Good teacher, boring class.  She is very willing to help you out if you have any problems.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   dr. mallard goes out of her way to make sure you understand the concepts in her classes. will work with you if you have problems (death in family, etc.). i wasn't really invested in the subject matter, but she made the class interesting. uses service learning, you learn so much about yourself and content when you do work in the community!
                
                   Great teacher. If you show up and participate, you will pass. Apply some effort and you will make an A or B. She is a fair grader.
                
                   Several speeches and group projects, as long as you do everything in the guidelines, you'll get a perfect score, even extra credit. Do all of the extra credit! Go to all of it!!! You'll be exempt from the final then. Attendance is mandatory for grade.
                
                   good teacher, knows his material. friendly, was always available to help students outside of class. be sure you really follow all instructions for class assignments or you'll lose points (especially on course projects). fun!
                
                   Laughably enough, Barbour takes himself seriously as a person. His lectures are dull and sitting through them is an excruciating pain. He's typically reserved to teaching the classes no one else wants to teach, and he makes sure to live up to the drabness. Grades on a curve, so however stupid your classmates are, will be whatever your grade is. GL.
                
                   Dr. JB has been one of my absolute favorite profs at A&M. When I thought there was no way to pass the class I simply went to her office hours and asked how she could help. She was extremely encouraging and helpful. Get to know her and she WILL help you. She also made the class discussions very interesting! Love her!
                
                   Lectures were very long and boring. Must go to class to know what will be on the quiz.
                
                   I really enjoyed having Dr. JB for Comm 446. There were 4 papers. The first 3 were around 6-7 pages. The last one was 15 pages, but we could expand on one of our previous papers. We had peer-review workshops and also had the opportunity to send Dr. JB our papers before the due date for her to give feedback. An A was duable if you put in the effort.
                
                   Too tough on assignments and has no idea what is going on in class. She teaches the TA's to be rough on grading and throughout the class they try to make you nervous and put pressure on you. NOT a friendly environment. 
                
                   Her syllabus sets you up guidelines to make a C, which is clearly stated, but she never says what is needed for an A. I went into office hours and it didn't seem to help. Her class that I had was taught by a grad student and we only met with Barbour once a week, so she set up the rules but had no real idea of what was going on in the classroom.
                
                   Professor Baker was awesome!  I loved the group project we did.  She cared if we learned. She was humble but had a lot to teach.  The skills I learned were practical for my career.  A great prof!!!
                
                   She teaches the material well and it's an easy class, but she goes off on tangents, sometimes spending 15 minutes of class asking students about relationships, and she shows clips from Sex and the City, which do nothing to increase understanding of the material. She is also obsessed with her marriage and has test questions about it.
                
                   He is ok....stickler for attendance....if you have more than 3 or 4 absences, he will lower your final letter grade....pretty easy classes...4 speeches and a midterm....ok teacher....kind of annoying and tries to be funny occasionally but he is cool.
                
                   She is the most understanding professor I have ever had and is willing to help students whenever possible. Would highly, highly recommend her. 
                
                   Information for testsquizzes are in her power points, didn't buy a book, but there was like one question on her final review that couldn't be found online or on her power points. Make sure you get with a group you like otherwise you'll be stuck with them for the entire  semester. Easy A class and the professor is really really sweet!
                
                   Took her for group comm. Tests include an individual 10 question MC quiz, then a 25 question group test. The entire semester is one big group project that you present at the end of the semester. She puts the powerpoints for lecture on eCampus so you don't really need to take notes because she reads off the powerpoint. Loved her and her class
                
                   there are four speeches, one test, no final, easy assignments. I put effort into my speeches and got a B. She is a spotty grader, some of my better speeches got lower grades than my bad ones. STUDY for the test because it makes the difference between an AB!! I love her, so sweet, great prof.. just have to put effort into her class. 
                
                   Very nice professor. She is funny and doesn't tend to lecture long. The speeches require effort, but I made an A on all of them. Classes are done before Thanksgiving break.
                
                   easy class, she makes it fun, class ends early every day
                
                   Mrs A is amazing! she relates well to the class and offers help wherever needed! this was by far my favorite class this semester! I would HIGHLY recommend her!
                
                   Not so great when I comes to communicating with students through email.
                
                   BEST PROF EVER
                
                   This prof is pretty cool.  Basically you give 4 speeches (which are essentially your test grades) and there are a few pop quizzes throughout the class. Pop quizzes are hard and come from specific material in the book!  but besides that, he grades speeches fairly and the class is pretty fun
                
                   I didnt wanna be in the class because it was at 8am, but after a week, I was hooked. He is so energetic and always smiling. I just love how he can remember every students full name without fail. He's got a rocking wardrobe! He is not from the South (ask him the airport story when he first moved here), but always calls you either &quot;sir&quot; or &quot;ma'am.&quot;
                
                   I really enjoyed the class and Professor Brown. He is really funny and loves to teach, I could tell.
                
                   I dont know about the earlier comment. He is extremely intelligent, that's a given. However, I am not sure if he is out to fail students though. True he grades hard, but what's the challenge then if it is an easy class&#63; I learned a lot and glad I took the course, he did a great job .
                
                   He's a good teacher, and he's really intelligent, but he makes that really clear to his students. He never gets on a friend level with his students. Just strictly teacher to student business. He seems to be a teacher to fail everyone, but I tihnk his attitude and strictness is only to scare the students that are only in his class as a blowoff class
                
                   It was a good class, i got a high B. I was mad cause i didn't get an A.  Besides that it was a good class.
                
                   His test are so hard!!! Made a study guide with all lecture notes and notes over chapters and still struggled on his tests. All of his test have A, B, C then A&B, or None  or All of the above of A&C.  Avoid
                
                   Marco is awesome. His class consists of 4 speeches, and a few in class quizzes. It is impossible to forget about any quiz or speech because he sends out "friendly reminder" emails.  He is a pretty fair/lenient grader. Marco is passionate about argumentation and debate and truly wants his students to excel in the course. Would take his class again
                
                   One of the best classes I have taken! Always involving the class and using examples that related to our everyday lives, but also how they applied in the real world. She always showed clips in class that related to the material. This class was an 8am, not mandatory, but I wanted to get up and go to class!! Wish everyone could take this class!
                
                   Class is mandatory, and she gives a ton of pop quizzes so make sure you read! I found the textbook free online. Also, skim through the PowerPoints because she will post random unannounced assignments in there. She is a tough grader when it comes to the actual speeches. All topics where about the environment try to pick something that interests you.
                
                   Nice guy but tough grader!  He's a B professor putting it simply. If you want an A in his class be prepared and ready to work otherwise sit back and enjoy a nice B- or + with little to no effort. 
                
                   By far the best professor I have had at A&M. I would take any of her classes again!! She is there for you at all times and just the sweetest lady. Her test are not that bad just study the vocabulary and the study guide. TAKE HER CLASS she is the best!!!
                
                   This is possibly one of the best classes I have taken at A&M. She is a great professor and her lectures are very entertaining. It is CRUCIAL that you attend them because at least 20 out of 50 of her exam questions come straight from lecture examples. Read the book because she will randomly throw in exam questions from the textbook.
                
                   She was a good enough teacher that tests almost entirely off of class lecture, but it's really tough to sit through all of her painful liberally biased lectures. Almost every point she makes ties back to how the democratic party is the best in her eyes. Not a popular view at A&M, consistently made the class uncomfortable
                
                   She's super nice and is very knowledgeable on her topic. Her tests go off of lecture mostly. Write stuff down during the group discussions, she brings those up too! She's super cool and if you know your stuff it won't be hard to make a B flat.
                
                   Truly one of the best professors at Texas A&M. His tests are very hard but he curves them so the entire class isn't failing, tons of reading, but his lectures are engaging, and he's traveled the world. If you're looking for an easy A, this isn't one of them, but it's a great class you won't forget taking.
                
                   I loved his class! Really great teacher, tests are hard but he usually curves like 20 points, but there's very few grades so your grade depends on those two tests and one giant research paper. Lectures are really interesting! Would definitely take again!
                
                   Very friendly, accomodating, and passionate about the material.
                
                   She grades hard and takes off for the smallest things. look at syllabus to know when things are due. you basically turn everything in online. she doesnt offer many hints. she has a cute dog with her all the time
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Greg Paul was absolutely amazing! His lectures were FUN to attend and the material his class covers was extremely interesting. If you have a chance to take Prof Paul, Do IT!! Plus, he's GORGEOUS!
                
                   Mr. Reed obviously loves public speaking. I enjoyed the class despite not being that interested in the subject matter. 
                
                   As long as you stay up to date on current events and come to class he generally has a lot of leniency. He never says attendance is mandatory but there are usually quizzes every week and if a lot of people don't show up then he'll give extra credit to the people that are there. 
                
                   If you are well knowledgeable and up to date on whats going on in the political world, this class is a breeze and if your not,  be prepared to read because he gives out weekly quizzes based on what's going on in the media in politics.  I didn't do so great on the quizzes, but my blog was pretty great, so I was able to make an A!
                
                   Great
                
                   Mrs. Riley was amazing when it came to describing rhetoric and how to do it, but she was definitely a little rough on the grading. She gave us long essay assignments, but thankfully there was only one midterm test that was easy. She will go to great lengths to help you write your paper and is extremely helpful. USE HER OFFICE HOURS.
                
                   I went to her office hours, and that's where she offers the most help. Class gets out early most of the time, and she's honestly one of the sweetest people ever. She's really relatable and understands if you are struggling! You do have to work hard on your speeches, but the speech environment is super chill because everyone is  in the same boat!
                
                   I would recommend her, however she is a very tough grader when it comes to speeches and reports. In class lectures can be very confusing and as a student you have to keep up with assignments because they overflow into one another which gets confusing.
                
                   She was awesome! I would definitely take ger again. She is kind, laid back and if you actually put effort in your speeches you'll make an A.
                
                   She was by far one of the worst professors I've ever taken. 
                
                   DO NOT TAKE HER!  She grades way to hard on speeches and expect you to be the worlds greatest speaker on the first speech.  Lectures are sometimes confusing and scattered out, you don't know what to write down. The quizzes are pretty simple if you do the study guide but that's the only thing easy in this class. this class shouldn't be this hard. 
                
                   She's a great teacher. We had three speeches and then a written exam. She is a hard grader but gives good feedback and if you put in effort and prepare well she will reward you! Going in to office hours is helpful, she is nice and approachable. She makes class fun and pretty interesting and she's very laid back.  I would take her again.
                
                   This is an easy class. She is very sweet and helpful. There are a few homework and quizzes. She offers extra credit activities.
                
                   Not a good teacher at all, does everything from power point and goes way too fast.  Quizzes and homework make no sense.  Grades very hard on speeches.
                
                   Bad teacher. She reads of off powerpoints the whole time and tends to be boring. Grades your speeches real hard. Unprepared for tests and does not give reviews. DONT TAKE HER!
                
                   She is awesome, not much more to be said
                
                   Sara is the most awesome teacher ever! I would love to take another class with her. She changed my life.
                
                   Prof. Street was jokingly all of Comm 101's mom. She was so sweet and always willing to help. Do the extra credit opportunities because always nice to have in bank! Some projects, some homework but fairly easy. Be ready to work with people all semester long. Don't blow off tests & read the txtbook for them! Lovely lady who really enjoyed teaching!
                
                   Mrs. Street makes class fun! She always cracks jokes in lectures and overall made class very enjoyable. . This course does have a lot of homework but majority of assignments are easy 100s. Tests are online and open book/notes so it is very easy to make good grades on those as long as you take good notes in class and have the book in front of you.
                
                   Don't call her Nancy, and you'll probably pass! But honestly, she's a good lecturer, she's engaging, the class is kind of blah, but she picks it up and makes it relatively easy. 
                
                   She tries to be funny when she lectures, but she's easy to understand. She will call you out if your talking to your neighbor or late to class. She can be pretty salty. She does have office hours, but she is very sarcastic and will sometimes make you feel stupid for asking certain questions. She gives extra credit by going to lectures. Tests easy
                
                   She is a very involved teacher and is very excited to lecture. The class is pretty easy and simple if you just show up and listen to her lectures. Very easy.
                
                   Go to class, because she does in-class activities to make sure you're there.  The best part was that it was 4  hours but we only had to meet once a week, but that meant a lot of outside work was required. She's very funny but kind of intimidating, her office hours were right after class so you could go ask anything and she was very helpful and nice
                
                   Expect a letter grade lower than what you think you'll get. She doesn't grade the major projects until the very end, so it's difficult to see where you stand. Don't email asking for help - go to office hours. She is also a morning person, so ask for help at that time of day. Good prof, just has too much on her plate. Her lectures are engaging.
                
                   Do all of your assignments on time and you will be fine. Professor Street really does care about her students so take advantage of her officeadvising hours to form a relationship with her and get clarification on anything you may need; she is more than happy to help!
                
                   She can be really wishy-washy at times but overall she really cares about her students. She answers most questions but towards the end of the semester she stopped replying to emails when she got busy. She can be a little snappy sometimes but has a lot on her plate. She's a great professor and really helpful. She works with you to do your best. 
                
                   The famous Muhammad Ali quote "Float like a butterfly, sting like a bee" has never been more true.  Never, ever miss a deadline unless you've talked to her beforehand - she is merciful, but at the same time, if you miss and then ask for forgiveness, you won't get it.  Do the assignments on time, don't be late for class, and you'll be okay.
                
                   this class was fairly easy. HOWEVER, she will find EVERY opportunity to show you that she has no mercy whatsoever which can turn an easy A class to one you fail. Late to class too many times? F.  E-learning isn't working for you and you can't do your assignment? Too dang bad. Don't understand the question? It's in the book, figure it out.
                
                   BE ON TIME or get called out! Quiz once a week, strictly from the textbook. Easy A. Gives the option to have quiz average count as final exam grade.
                
                   EASY CLASS! You will have a reading quiz every monday, but as long as you read then easy A on those. Four speeches. Just memorize them and you'll get an A. If you go to class and have a good quiz average, you won't have to take the final.
                
                   Test review is unclear, and will find every opportunity to &quot;give you a 0!&quot;
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Hard class, but he tried to make it as easy as possible and curved a ton.  Nice guy and it's helpful to go to his office if you don't understand the material, which is, again, very hard. You have to stay on top of this class and do the readings before each class, because he gives weekly quizzes unannounced.
                
                   He gives weekly quizzes and his test are hard! The highest grade anybody made (class of over 300) on the first exam was an 80!
                
                   Only has 3 tests the whole semester, and no final exam. There's pop quizzes on the reading that was assigned, and you must read the text in detail to know the answers. 10 quizzes a semester. Her tests aren't too bad, just a little tricky. Make sure you don't get behind on reading, or cramming for the test will not be fun. READ, it actually helps!!!
                
                   Excellent professor
                
                   There are two quizzes the entire semester and that is probably the hardest thing because they're detailed. Just follow the guidelines on the outline for speeches. You just need to read/look at book for the quizzes! I hate speeches but I did fine!
                
                   He is such a nice awesome teacher who is always there for you to clear up whatever students are not understanding, his class is some work but he is a great teacher who just wants everyone to pass
                
                   Best class I've taken 
                
                   One of the best teachers I've had. He is super helpful and genuinely cares about his students. The tests are relatively easy, I read the book and look over my notes the night before and have mad an A on all of them so far. He offers an extra credit opportunity that can really help your grade. Overall, I would definitely take this class again.
                
                   Ziemer was an amazing professor! He is extremely funny, nice, and he doe care about you as the sent personally. In addition something that I like was that he uses real world examples to help you better understand his lecture points. 
                
                   Takes attendance, so go to class! Prepares you for the exams and is really straight forward about the material.  
                
                   Jordan is a great teacher, he will help you as much as he can. His lectures are awesome , he's awesome and my grade was awesome. 
                
                   Mrs. Sanders is super sweet and a great teacher.
                
                   Very good prof.
                
                   Easy and friendly.  She is sweet and very understanding.  If you are nervous about giving speeches, Mrs. Sanders does not put pressure on you.  She lets the class go at their speed and adapts to each class.  For example, there were more business majors in my class; so we had more business related speeches.  Sweet lady!  Easy A!
                
                   Mrs. Sanders is an awesome teacher!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comment, I dropped because no matter what you did, it still wasn't enough. Next semester I will take someone else.
                
                   It doesn't matter how hard you work or what grades you receive on various assignments, you WILL NOT receive an A.
                
                   I took Dr. Sanders radio/TV announcing class. What a hack this guy is. He is utterly ridiculous, and has his TA grade everything you do. You don't even know what you are making in the class until the end of it virtually. Take this somewhere else, or you'll regret it. Guaranteed!
                
                   I graduated in 2002 and spent 4 years with Dr. Sanders...now let me tell you..if you don't pay attention..then yes..he can be hard..but if you pay attention and do the work assigned to you, then life will be easy..biggest key (and I'm a teacher now and see this) freakin' show up!
                
                   Take extensive notes....he likes to give pop quizes. NEVER be late. Most tests info is from his verbal lectures. Laugh at his corny jokes.
                
                   Just know, Dr Sanders is an amazing teacher. And as a graduate of the RTV Department I take great pride in everything I learned from Dr. S & Dr. Haskins.  Though his jokes may get old and his rules seem dumb, (which is the nature of the business) if you do your work, Go to class & have a genuine interest in broadcasting, you'll do just fine!
                
                   Good teacher.  He is very hard but makes himself available to hlp students.  He is only hard so that his students are pushed to their best.  Pay attention and GO TO CLASS.
                
                   He has is favorites in class who make A's even when they screw up badly when giving a speech. At least by his standards. Take someone else if possible.
                
                   Sanders is very serious about the work that he does. If you are serious too, you will be fine. He can be difficult at times and is very meticoulous. You will either love him or hate him. You HAVE to go to class, and you'll do EVERYTHING his way...
                
                   Expects way too ****ing much for a beggining speech class.  If you're not a famous speeker don't expect an A in here.
                
                   Can be a jerk sometimes in class, but out of class can be cool. He'll help you out in any way he can you just have to ask.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   he is a little too anal retentive for the program he teaches hes short tempered and has silly pointless rules for silly pointless things-and because he is one of two teachers in the program you hear his stupid jokes over and over agian.
                
                   She is a great teacher. 
                
                   She is a fair grader and an A is totally feasible for anyone in all of her classes, but her teaching methods are not exactly ideal.  She'll often conduct a round-robin reading of the textbook during class, which is annoying. Her classes can be excruciatingly boring, but she is direct and straight-forward.  Attendance and textbook required.
                
                   I just took this class in maymester and it was easy. She is also a fair grader. Do the work and you get the grade. I'm glad I took this class!
                
                   easy,laid back class!!! her way of teaching is her own! she is fun and very explainatory of assignments! no quizzes! speeches are fun and interesting and only 2 exams which she gives u a study guide for! DEF. TAKE HER!!!
                
                   She isn't the best public speaker herself, but she's been teaching for a long time. At times, I was a bit confused about assignments: they weren't always clear. She grades fairly. The speeches can be fun, and there are only 3 main ones. The midterm & final are the only tests and she gives you a study guide (there isn't much focus on them in class)
                
                   test
                
                   she is a very boring teacher and hard to understand
                
                   Easy class. Prof was helpful and gave plenty of time to finish assignments. This is a good elective class to take. Does involve writing, but nothing difficult.
                
                   She's a very nice lady, explains exactly what you need to do. No reason not to get an A in this class. Even though public speaking sucks, it wasnt hard at all.
                
                   She is a very good teacher. The speeches were interesting. She may not be the &quot;hippest&quot; teacher, but the class is over all an easy one. Just do well on the speeches and you'll do fine.
                
                   Easy class, except tests were annoying.  Speeches were somewhat interesting. Should be an easy A if you just try.
                
                   for a public speaking teacher, kind of boring.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Thank God she is leaving Corpus Christi! TEXAS A&M needs to hire English speaking professors.  THIS is a must.
                
                   She is very hard to understand, and doesn't always make alot of since.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   She grades off rest of class. she strongly believes soemoen has to fail so everyone will make A B C or D. unfair and unreasonable
                
                   Had her for a senior level COMM class. She returned a rough draft with loads of grammar and language corrections on it. However, all her corrections were wrong. I even took it to the tutoring center and had them check it and the English tutors agreed that her corrections were wrong. When your English isn't strong, don't make corrections on grammar.
                
                   You just can't understand one word she says
                
                   She is really smart and demading.  If you want to learn, take this class.  If you want an easy A, take a different one.
                
                   HELLO! PUBLIC SPEAKING TEACHER SHOULD BE ABLE TO SPEAK ENGLISH AT AN AMERICAN COLLEGE!
                
                   This women made my life very hard. She took this required course way too seriously. I also found it ironic that she was a Public Speaking teacher who did not speak English very well.
                
                   Not an easy class.  Everything by the book so to speak.  Not recommended.
                
                   Lenient in terms of grading, but sometimes she'll add up the grade wrong and give you a different t score on blackboard. She gave a few quizzes (one unexpected) and showed a lot of videos. No final, no tests. A bunch of speeches though. Attendance isn't mandatory but she gives cumulative points if you show up consistently. She's understanding too
                
                   VERY unorganized. She said she'd have assignments graded by a certain day or be at a certain place & hardly followed through. She's a grad student, so doesn't email back quickly. Also, she input my grade into Blackboard as lower than I actually received--twice. While she does cut class short, I value a reliable & organized professor more. :
                
                   This was a fun class. Just be prepared to give your speeches and don't act like you're too cool for it, because she WILL call you out. Very funny, very hilarious professor. Gives fantastic feedback and helps you develop your speeches!
                
                   If you get this professor DONT BUY THE BOOK!!! the assignments & tests are through an online website in which a web-version of the book is provided. She usually doesn't grade attendance (even though she does TAKE attendance). She's a super easy teacher and will often work with the class on coming up with deadlines for assigments.
                
                   Class was always interesting, about twenty people total she takes attendance. She is very understanding and is flexible with turning in class work if you notify her ahead of time. She offers bonus points. Presenting in our class was always fun.  HER CLASS WAS THE BEST!! It was probably the only class I looked forward too. I RECOMMEND HER CLASS!
                
                   Comm Theory was pretty interesting, there is a lot of homework assignment that you must do but it is not that difficult. He explains in detail what will be on the test and is a man of his word. I highly recommend his classes.
                
                   I took Dr. Hansen for small group comm and for intercultural.  The small group class was very challenging: Just make sure you do what you group claims you are going to do for your orginization!!!  I am VERY glad I took Dr. Hansen for Intercultural, you could tell he really enjoyed the class.  I learned a lot about the topic.  He really is a nice gu
                
                   I took him for public speaking. His tests are brutal but he is fair. He will help you if you give him the chance. Comes off as standoffish but he is actually very cordial if you get to know him. I would take him again if you arelooking to get something out of it but if you are looking for an easy A this is not the class.
                
                   Took him for public speaking. HARD GRADER! I think he gave out one A on a speech the entire semester. He's a decent enough guy, but his grading is terrible. If you can take someone else, you'll have better luck.
                
                   I doubt any class this professor teaches will be an easy A.  If you want to get your moneys worth out of your education and are up to a bit of a challenge, this is the profesor to take. For a bonus, he offers a community service project or a Grad level paper. As for the paper, he walks you through the process; a bit of preperation for grad school.
                
                   THIS PROFESSOR MAKES THIS CLASS THE PITS. I WISH HE WAS NOT THE PROF BECAUSE IT COULD BE A INTERESTING CLASS. HE TALKS DOWN TO STUDENTS AND SEEMS MISERABLE AS A PERSON.  I WANT TO LEARN BUT IT IS NEXT TO IMPOSSIBLE WITH THE WAY HE LECTURES AND THEN HIS TEST DO NOT HAVE MUCH TO DO WITH THE COURSE MATERIAL. MAYBE HE SHOULD BE TEACHING IN NEW YORK!
                
                   Hansen should not be teaching anyone! Not a teacher, nor does he have a pleasant attitude. Stay away from any of his classes. Take anyone of the great comm prof who really care about the students.
                
                   This professor needs to learn his manners. He is quick to judge others. Makes things VERY unclear and changes the rules as he goes along. I would NOT EVER take him again for any class. He needs to go back from where he is from and also needs  learn to teach!!!
                
                   I took his class in the summer and made an A. It's a lot of work but he is a good and fair professor.
                
                   I thought this class was kinda hard and had to work on getting my A. He makes you do several writing projects. His tests were a doozy. He also makes you do a volunteer project outside of the classroom. I would take him again.
                
                   His teaching is different than other professors, but he articulated his points well. He made you aware of the requirements you needed to complete to get the grade you want. If you want an A tell these are the things you need to do, etc. I would take his class again.
                
                   Look below
                
                   he hard and demanding but he makes you feel as if you earned your grade. he there when you need him
                
                   He is the best professor I have had during my time here at school.  He explains himself very well and is very helpful
                
                   I thought he was very helpful, I always found it easy to talk to him and meet with him to clarify any problems. He was also good at evaluating his own assignments and doing away with unreasonable assignments. His tests could be hard, but were always clarified during the reviews.
                
                   This professor uses such big words and even makes up some not found in the dictionary to appear intelligent.  Problem is he is supposed to teach communication but can't communicate very well.
                
                   Awesome professor! This is a long course but well worth it- she keeps it fun and interesting. There is one big group project, short essays, and 4 quizzes that count for a big % of overall grade. Don't skip out on studying for quizzes- that is a MUST. The textbook is highly essential and informative for the course and communication as a whole.
                
                   Professor Ivy care about college students. She makes you work for your grades, but offers you generous amounts of help if you ask for it. She is extremely inspirational and her theatrical demeanor makes the class fun and entertaining. Reading is key and get ready for a group project. 
                
                   She is great. Her classes are very interesting , you wont get bored. 
                
                   She is a personality, so most students either adore her or find her domineering.  She is very spirited and it is obvious that she gives it her all and loves her students and job.  She keeps the class fresh and interesting by providing a variety of teaching methods and assignments.  She grades moderately.  Good class if you enjoy the subject.
                
                   I have taken a few classes by IVY. You either hate her or love her. I loved her and i still had a hard time in the class. Just follow her directions to the T and study for the tests and you will be fine.
                
                   I don't think she ever actually taught us anything. She babbles on and on about nonsense and you're left up to your own devices to actually learn. She might have been the worst teacher I've ever had. If you have to take her, don't.
                
                   Proceed with caution.
                
                   This was the first year she's had the Gender class do COMM Night, word to the wise, LOTS of stress involved with little help on her part and almost no traditional class elements, not entirely sure what I actually learned.
                
                   Very difficult grader. The papers and speeches are graded sternly.You must be at class and never use a cell phone or laptop, or she will put you on her &quot;list,&quot; then you can forget about a good grade.There is no extra credit or makeup and her 40+ page syllabus is difficult to follow. If you have 1 low grade you will drop AT LEAST a letter grade too.
                
                   She is a hard grader, as far as presenting goes, but the tests are easy as long as you do the review that she gives you. She is super helpful and so interesting. She is quite the feminist, and did play favorites (but which teacher doesn't&#63;). Overall, I would recommend her to anyone. Her classes fill up very quickly, so sign up fast if you want her.
                
                   I had Dr. Ivy before and enjoyed her class but didn't think too highly of her. After taking a second class with her I absolutely adore this woman. She's willing to help and genuinely cares for her students. She will love you as long as you are a good student and respect her. She wrote the textbook so you can't bs anything in her class, she'll know.
                
                   Ivy plays favorites. Don't get me wrong, she's a great professor, funny, and her course is interesting, but she likes some students and not others. I heard rumors of this prior to taking her class but figured it wouldn't be an issue because I am a good student. On projects I've had points docked while other student haven't for the same mistakes.
                
                   she drops points on your final grade when you're absent because it is the only way people can justify attending this worthless class. i could literally feel myself getting more stupid after every class period. this class should be presented in a 2 hour seminar to 15 year olds. i learned absolutely nothing about anything. shame on ivy.
                
                   first of all, the whole class is a joke. the &quot;lectures&quot; are a joke. this class being required is an insult to any college student's intelligence. if you don't already know the information that she is covering, then you should drop out of school- you are not college material. it is this class that is lowering the bar of higher education- devolution
                
                   Avoid taking Ivy for intro if possible. She really does come off as a know-it-all and gives guidelines you would expect in high school. ex. One free absence is allowed for a night class, any after that is 6pts off FINAL GRADE! Also, she makes you think you did awesome on group project then gives you a low B. Plays favoritism, NO DOUBT.
                
                   She thinks she is perfect, but she does not really care to teach.
                
                   Avoid taking from Ivy if possible.  She hardly covers the material on her tests, her grading on group projects is extremely subjective & inconsistent (you will fill like you are in 4th grade again), and she is very passive aggressive overall.  Be prepared to be annoyed if you take from her.
                
                   Gender Comm i an awesome class. There are more chicks in this class than any other class I have taken. Ivy is cool and she is not a feminist that others have made her out to be. She has been hurt in the past but is now over it. I highly recommend this class because you will have a lot of fun. Keep her on your good side.
                
                   Ivy is great! Yes she is somewhat liberal and a feminist but she is extremely fair. Be friendly and stay on her good side.  I have taken Ivy for intro, nonverbal and I am taking her for another class now. She loves to have fun and loves teaching college students. If you make it a point to speak in class she will like you more. DO NOT BE RUDE TO HER
                
                   Here is the most unbiased and fair report about Dr. Ivy.  Yes, she is a feminist despite the fact that she says otherwise on the first day of class.  Don't panic guys, you can get around this.  Just keep your mouth shut and you will be fine.  As a guy, I did just fine in the class and got a &quot;b&quot;.  Although a feminist and a liberal, Ivy is FAIR.
                
                   He is one of the greatest teacher, wise and funny. I love his Film History Class
                
                   Doesn't ensure that conflicts won't come up with your schedule because he fails to tell the school to automatically enroll you in the required lab if you sign up for a course with one of his labs. However, he is a super nice guy and a good professor.
                
                   Huie is the best prof in the Communication Dept.  He gives test reviews far in advance and covers all of the material in class, so the tests aren't any surprise.  He is also lenient on grading and does his best to help students succeed.  Take from Huie!
                
                   Dr. Huie was so much fun, he is a genuine guy that really knows how to get the material across.
                
                   A little different from the usual Huie classes, here the test are half multiple choice.  No worries, Huie is still the best teacher at TAMUCC.  Classes my be somewhat boring but with Huie on the mound you can't go wrong.  He is such a nice gentle and brittle old man.  Huie for president.
                
                   He LOVES talking about movies! You can point out such obvious, no-brainer things and he will think you are a genius. The midterm and final are 100% writing, so you better know the terminology and know how to apply it. I studied twice - night before midterm and night before final and made an A. Overall great guy.
                
                   Great teacher all around
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Awesome guy, Good teacher.
                
                   Excellent professor, very approachable, but did expect you to work for your grades. I always found him one of the most enthusiastic of my professors, but that was when he was teaching the film classes.
                
                   Dr. Huie is very knowledgable about Film History, but he doesn't show much enthusiasm.
                
                   Bobby Lewis is a straight up G. He is brilliant and knows his stuff. TAMUCC students are lucky  to have such a great, YOUNG, HIP, TALENTED, PROFESIONAL in thier communication department. Things will only get better in the fall of 2014 when the new Com Production track is installed.
                
                   I thoroughly enjoyed this class. Bobby Lewis is very relaxed and easy to talk to. His class was very hands on which helped me actually learn things!
                
                   Excellent, Excellent teacher!  great at explaining the material and making it relate to life.  Wish he was still at A&M so i could take more of his classes
                
                   He is inhumanely nit picky with the third and fourth speeches we have to present. He uses APA style format so be prepared for that crap. If you like to speak then this is obviously your class, if not then it's not so bad.
                
                   MUST TAKE HER if you need Public Speaking. Joenie is an amazing professor! Clear & concise. She is very quick in responding to emails and BB messages. There are a handful of speeches but very easy to prepare for. She gives you the rubric with exactly what is needed. Weekly quizzes online over textbook. She is soft spoken and a great professor!
                
                   Dr. Quintanilla was an awesome professor, very classy and laid back. I had her for honors speech- she would lecture for about a week on do's, don'ts and techniques then assigned a speech using those techniques. Only about 5 speeches per semester. I don't know how I got a B, I thought I would get an A, but I learned a lot but oh well.
                
                   She's amazing.  I was totally dreading public speaking, but she makes it as comfortable for the most uncomforable person as humanly possible.
                
                   She's AMAZING! So friendly and willing to help. EVERYONE absolutely loved her class. She made everything so interesting. I would definitely take this class again!
                
                   Quintanilla was fantastic. She was funny, relatable, and best of all, she showed true respect for her students. I got an A in her class, and while she is very easy, you have to work hard. But if you show an effort you WILL excel. She is also very giving of her time.
                
                   GREAT LADY!  SHE CARES ABOUT YOU AND WILL HELP YOU WITH ALL YOUR NEEDS.  SHE IS SWEET AND LOVES HER JOB!!   I WISH MORE COMM PROF WERE LIKE HER.
                
                   She rocks! her class is so fun and intresting, you just have a blast and actualy learn more than to just give a speech.
                
                   she is the best public speaking teacher hands down
                
                   I've had Kelly for 3 classes and made A's in all. She is super helpful and approachable. She'll do anything she can to help you out so you do good. Take her if you can!
                
                   Awesome teacher! Take her for public speaking- shes the best!!
                
                   so easy...so cute
                
                   WOW, she is just wonderful, very informative and just makes you desire to learn more and more. Her and Dr. Wahl make a wonderful team.
                
                   SOOOO cool! Funny, nice, awesome teacher. Best in department.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Kelly is a super hottie :)
                
                   Dr. Sollitto is a wonderful professor who really prepares you for graduate school and beyond.  He challenges you to think critically on some of the papers as well- which there are many papers but not overly difficult.   Grading criteria is straightforward so you know exactly what expectations are. Class participation is a must!  Had for 2 classes!
                
                   I can't believe she only has 1 review. this instructor is amazing! She is hilarious, very patient and understanding. She gives A LOT of extra credit and is more than willing to work with you on every assignment. She genuinely cares about each of her students and wants to see each one be successful! She also makes the class entertaining and fun!
                
                   She made the class as easy and entertaining as possible, and was very helpful and easy to approach.  She was lenient with attendance and phone usage, and just focused on teaching.  She graded moderately and provided a variety of teaching methods and assignments.  She was easy to follow, a great, up-to-speed teacher and a beautiful person.
                
                   Rachel Stanley is the communication adviser. Expect to see her never if you have an 8-5. She only accepts walk-ins from 1:30-3:30, shes never available for an appointment, she never responds to emails. You couldn't ask for a worse mandatory adviser.
                
                   Easy if you pay attention. MUST attend class as every other class is a film you have to watch. Tells jokes to keep the subjects light and interesting. Very passionate about TV and film.  Exams are multiple choice and couple of essays that must be pages long. Your hand will cramp, be prepared. 
                
                   Dr. Thompson is passionate about discussing the aspects of film and movies and that makes you want to attend his classes. Although we spend a lot of time watching movies, we discuss them too. Most grades come from class discussions or discussions on Blackboard. Few tests and a little reading. 
                
                   Never boring.
                
                   Horrible! Clearly can tell He didn't make it in his producing career. Which lead to writing books. He's often one sided and expects classes to understand some absurd shows and the real reasoning behind what the shows/movie consists of.  Almost as if were suppose to know literally what producer / directors minds at time were thinking.  If not d Or F
                
                   Super cute prof, tough grader though. Reading, and taking notes is a must. There will be quizzes, but are super easy if you just take the time to read. Note taking will help you focus for what is on the exam. Start your paper as soon as you can, and you will do excellent in the class.
                
                   Dr. Thompson is a younger professor so he is more in tune w/ students. DO NOT get him mad, it doesn't happen very often but he's scary when it does happen. He takes note of who is absent and it is to your benefit to go to class! Daily assignments are easy as long as you pay attention. Exams and papers can be tough so don't procrastinate.
                
                   He covers A LOT of info but if you take notes on what he says and pay attention, you should do well. He gives alright reviews; he only has a midterm and final. He does have high standards for papers but if you listen really well in class, you should do well on the paper. He values class discussion, so speak up! Keep all handouts! He's a GREAT prof!
                
                   Thompson is a good teacher.  He goes over all of the material in class, so tests aren't too bad.  He covers a lot of material so you have to put in the study time.  He grades fairly and offers extra credit.  He will give you a second chance on a test or paper if you bomb.  There is no political agenda in his class (some people are too sensitive).
                
                   Was easy-going, but expected quality work to be turned in. One of the better professors in Communications.
                
                   Cool guy, but grades kinda hard.  Be sure to know your stuff inside and out on short answer questions.
                
                   Awesome teacher! Very knowledgable of pop culture. Has a sense of humor and teaching style that makes the class a deviation from the average, dry, droning professors that are so common today.
                
                   He is a fun teacher -- very young and a little green behind the ears.  But he has potential.  But he is book-learned and this course would be better if taught by someone who actually worked as a script writer.  He couldn't give any first-person intelligence to the topic.
                
                   Small lecture setting (12 of us) was perfect. Dr. Viser came prepared every class with the most interesting lectures about communication activism. Really knows his stuff as he's worked professionally in comm.  Learned a heck of a lot - especially a larger vocabulary (better bring a dictionary!).  Handsomecutefun, the best prof I've had at TAMUG.
                
                   Dr. Ball is awesome! She is serious about her job and it is evident. She expects you to take your job as a student just as seriously. If you do that, you're good. Attend classes, ask questions and be ready to answer the questions she asks you in class.
                
                   She's kinda disorganized at times but tries to make up for it. Doesn't move on if things are unclear. Don't mess around in her class (texting, talking, etc.). She makes lectures fun but takes teaching seriously. The level of difficulty is as the other CSDO professors but youll learn a lot from her if you study and pay attention. I enjoyed her class
                
                   OVERALL FUN CLASS! HER LECTURES ARE INTERESTING AND SHE MAKES US LAUGH. ATTENDANCE IS A MUST, ESPECIALLY IN THIS FIELD! JUST LIKE ANY OTHER CLASS, YOU NEED TO DO WELL TO EARN YOUR GRADE! LOOKING FORWARD TO MORE CLASSES WITH DR. BALL! SHE REALLY KNOWS HER STUFF!!
                
                   Scatter-brained, very hard to follow, and treats you rudely if you go to her office hours for help. I understand that she is a busy lady but she could have some common courtesy and not snap at students who come in for help. Take Dr. Beams for speech & hearing science, she's much easier to understand and much nicer than Dr. Ball!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He is very nice and understanding. His class is very useful and you learn a lot of interesting things.
                
                   The test materials are kind of hard but majority of the grades from group projects which count as test grades. Big bonus for final exam it counts as extra points not against you. Other than that though its a pretty easy class.
                
                   Dr. Elkins is a very kind and good professor. He is gentle, but he teaches alot of great material in class. This is a great class for all majors!
                
                   Great professor! Is he single&#63;!&#63;
                
                   This woman is useless as an advisor and as a part of the university. I can't believe someone could be so absolutely dumb. I've never met someone so unqualifed in my life. So utterly worthless.
                
                   This is a good teacher for phonetics! 4 exams & final exam is optional. Take great notes and study well, you'll get an A if you try!
                
                   This class wasn't difficult at all. Took it as a night class, so it was pretty relaxing. Screwed up my final speech because I was sick, but with all the extra credit opportunities, I still aced that class! Definitely recommend him.
                
                   If you don't like public speeking, this is the class for you.  I did two speeches the entire semester and they were easy. The bulk of the class is taking notes and doing group activities.  He's very nice and will work with you.  Gives lots of extra credit!
                
                   Very Easy class. He's really easy. work's not too hard. He's pretty lenient.
                
                   Good professor...but he gives alot of work.
                
                   Dr. Salt is a hot head and extremely arrogant. Although his classes are easy, they are full of his mindless anectodes, and his tests are &quot;Salarized&quot; and do not follow the textbook. Oh and if you are an athlete, don't even bother coming to class because you're going to get an A either way.
                
                   Best professor in the Communications department! Dr. S taught me so much about Radio and Television! His classes were my favorites!
                
                   Fantastic professor! He is one of the best at TAMUK!
                
                   The classes are easy, however he can be pretty arrogant. He likes to joke and laugh so that part is good, but he cant stand it when you know something that he doesnt. However, Easy A!
                
                   Thinks he knows it all, but might be getting to old to keep up.
                
                   Salt is great, you learn alot, even though it may seem boring some of the time. His classes are what help my gpa, lol.
                
                   Salt is great.  Take as many of his courses as you can.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Good stuff. He can be difficult, but I learned alot.
                
                   com was great. good prof.
                
                   :)
                
                   Totally awesome prof!  Good sense of humor -- even though he has his days.  Highly Recommended!
                
                   his class last summer was really great.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Really good guy!
                
                   Thnk God he is gone.  Realy messed up my GPA.  What a jurk.  I was in his last class to teach and you would think he would be easy but the speech part messed me up.  His timing was not correct and he is an old fart.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Funny teacher
                
                   he is a jerk. you will think his class will be easy but the way he grades screws you over. his speeches are what screw you over the most. you can practice your speech for days and time it just right, but his time will alwasy count even if it is wrong!
                
                   Do Not take his class it will lower your gpa.  you could be a straight a student and fail his class.  seems super easy in beginning but he screws you w/speeches.
                
                   HE SUCKS
                
                   His grading method stinks.  His speeches stink even more.  His time is always wrong but you are the one who gets the bad grade for it.  you will think you got an A, but in reality you get a big fat F.
                
                   Dr. Robertson is a phenomenal instructor.  His top priority to to educate students, and while the class is not an easy A, he does make you work but the work is not too time intensive.
                
                   Dr. Rob is a fantastic teacher. He is very helpful and makes class interesting. His tests are not too difficult if you study. Take clear notes on the powerpoints and you will be golden this semester! I would definitely take him again!
                
                   Dr. Robertson is a wonderful instructor. One of WTAMU's finest.
                
                   Tanner is a great teacher! He works hard to keep you interested in the topics and doesn't give out much homework. Tests are difficult but not impossible if you study. He's very understanding and a great guy overall. He tells lots of stories during his classes and relates them to what you're talking about. Definitely a class worth taking.
                
                   I've encountered few professors who invest as much time and energy in her students as Professor Overlock. Her classes are difficult yet vastly rewarding. She uses her connections and intellectual gifts to help foster and develop student strengths. Also noteworthy, she believes in learning via hard work and experience, not textbook regurgitation.
                
                   EVERYTHING has something to do with real life experience to prepare students for careers. Students get individualized assignments to their career goals and interests. Fun teaching style. Enjoyed every one of her classes (I took 4), but they are not easy. She is not a fan of textbooks, so saved $ there, but did have to do a lot of internet research.
                
                   Fabulous professor in..Texarkana&#63;Fulbright scholar, int'l experience, speaks 4 or 5 languages,huge media experience at world class publications. Charismatic teacher who cares for students, urges us to excel and will work hard with us and for us. Learned more from her than any other professor in my entire college career. Xlt & knowledgeable speaker.
                
                   Dr. Overlock takes mass comm students each year to Europe for field studies in journalism. We got to go to places and meet people we would never have even dreamed of without this class.  Many of us have kept those professional contacts. She arranged 2 internships in Europe for students! BEST JOUR PROF EVER! Works with students to succeed in career.
                
                   The best instructor ever.  Extensive experience and contacts in media that she uses to help her students. Helps students at every level. Really cares about her students. Will work with students to help them achieve their goals. Great experience. Glad to have stayed in Texarkana for my education!
                
                   She is awesome,has a lot of great advice,works w/ you one one,straight forward. You did use the books but mostly was a group discussion class. Overall she is a great mentor. I would def take her again.
                
                   Took her for business communication but it was more like an English class. Lots of writing and the only feedback I seemed to get was about my grammar. Only one presentation at the end of the semester the rest of it is all papers.
                
                   Get ready to do alot of reading and a lot of papers Shes has a lot of major papers that she wants done and expects it to be college level and error free you will work hard for grades in this class and she does a lot of group work
                
                   Very good teacher. She's a stickler for grammar but it makes you work that much harder. You can tell she loves what she does which makes the class fun and interesting. As long as you do your work you will pass. Awesome teacher. I would take her again! Had a few bad  group members and she was very flexible and understanding. Great teacher!!
                
                   Very funny & entertaining.  Does group projects in class for extra credit, very easy. Normal assignments, journals, group blog on BB. Group presentation at end of semester.  IF you ask questions make sure the answer is not on Blackboard first, or she will call you out in class. I only got a B because I didn't do a few journals and blogs. 
                
                   Professor Rhodes gives great feedback.  She makes her class feel important and wants everyone to be successful.
                
                   Amazing professor. Truly cares about her students. Will never hand you a grade, expects you to put in the work. Show up to class, listen and you will learn something AND pass with an A
                
                   Very nice and funny professor. Tests are difficult and often include material that hasn't been lectured on. Study the chapter in the textbook rather than the PowerPoints.
                
                   I took Bus and Prof Speaking with him. He knows his stuff! Test reviews are very useful. Class was fun. Grading on the speeches was strict however, the test and other graded components allow a student to make an A or B with a decent effort. For the speeches, if you use all of the items on the provided critique sheet, you can score well.
                
                   350 characters are definetly not enough to describe how great her class is. Her classes focus on personal development and are geared to getting a job after college. She is always giving you feedback to improve on assignments so that you can use it for a job portfolio. She truly cares about her students. Best COMM teacher ever! 
                
                   Awesome Teacher!
                
                   I always thought about being a teacher, but after Mr. Puchot's class, I really really want to teach.  He makes learning fun!
                
                   Very good teacher the best by far!!!!
                
                   Great Teacher.One of my favorite classes. Puchot critisizes in a helpful way.  He wants you to become the best you can be.  He is demanding but you will learn alot about group work and speaking in many situations.
                
                   This was a good class and helpful for presentations.  It requires team work and homework.  He is a very interesting teacher and one of the best I have had.
                
                   I enjoyed this class, however it was extremely challenging and required complete commitment to the homework.  In addition, I would recommend this teacher to other students.
                
                   The Professor is tough but a lot of fun.He keeps your focus ( NIGHT CLASS)and is easy to work with.He truly cares about his students and only wants the best for us. I would take another course from him anytime.
                
                   Great subject knowledge. Always willing to help. Wants us to succeed.
                
                   Prof Pulido is a great instructor and offers a lot of great advice,she doesn't accept BS but will go out of her way to help you,if she sees you making an effort,I absolutely adore her and would recommend her to anyone interested in public relations.
                
                   Dr. Brantley was by far one of my favorite teachers in college. He knows communications. He always had the best answer and you could tell he loved his job and his students. He was very helpful and made sure we understood what he was teacher. Talk to him! He is just awesome!
                
                   Great Instructor know what he's talking about in class used the text book somewhat, He made the class easy and enjoyable.
                
                   Dr. Carwile is a very good teacher in the professional interviewing class. She takes time to work 1 on 1 with every student
                
                   Showcases selected students (based on some unfathomable criteria),often lacks professional demeanor with those who are not her faves.  Assignments,projects,lectures ramble w/o focus.Window on office door is covered up, clearly shows that she does not want to be bothered.  Considering another major or going elsewhere to get a mass comm degree.
                
                   She is a very excellent professor.  She provides good advice and a conducive learning environment.  I learned a lot from her.
                
                   While she's a nice person, I don't know if she's the best teacher. Things aren't always as well-defined as one would like. Sometimes suffers from delusions of grandeur. Expects a lot but doesn't tell you what she's looking for. Vague and occasionally disinterested. Not impossible, but I've had better. Needs to work on student/teacher skills.
                
                   Dr. Carwile was a great instructor. She always made herself clear on what she wanted. I took her for Speech and she does expect you to be prepared when you come to class ready to give a speech. A word of caution, you must study for the tests that come from the book.
                
                   Expect to wait at least a week before ur assignment gets graded. Tests r fill in the blank. A lot of assignments in between tests. This class is sort of pointless imo
                
                   This class is team taught with her and Dr. Browning. Dr. Osei-Hwere is very intelligent, she knows her stuff, but speaks very quiet. My advice to you is to pay attention, sit towards the front and take all of the notes that you can and you will be very successful. The test are fair, study your notes and you will do just fine on them.
                
                   He is an excellent Professor.  He is interesting, engaging, and makes sure you understand.  I am taking every class he offers.  He is brilliant and as a result is moving up in the University.  He is hard to reach, but that is because his boss doesn't do his job, therefore Russell has to.  If you don't take his class, you are missing out.
                
                   very personable! teaches discussion classes, if you prefer lecture/notes format he's not for you. makes students think outside the box, and works to help students reach their potential and grow as individuals. he IS big on being liked, but that doesn't diminish his value as a teacher. difficult to reach, due to his commitments to the university.
                
                   kerry/edwards&#63;  soo old, get over it.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Russell is a fantastic teacher and person.  He is always willing to go out on a limb and make sure we as students step out of our box to learn something.  Even further, he will stop at nothing to make sure we understand what he is teaching.
                
                   Russell is big on being liked...Everyone seems to really like him, but I think he looses focus on what's important. His students (as opposed to himself) He is a political player and it effects class. He is very hard to contact!
                
                   Very soft spoken. Class was super easy to pass, and rather boring. Be prepared to do a LOT of speeches, but they are super easy and can mostly be made up on the spot. There is also a online portion to her classes, its costly so be prepared.
                
                   He the best!!!! A sweet heart... You will like the way he teaches
                
                   Very helpful.                        Makes the class interesting and fun.
                
                   HE IS AN AWSOME PROFFESOR I TOOK MOST OF HIS COMMS CLASSES AND THEY WERE GREAT GOT A+ IN ALL OF THEM YES YOU DO HAVE TO PARTICIPATE IN CLASS AND READ ALOT AND WRITE A FEW ESSAYS BUT HIS AWSOME I RATE HIM A 4.0
                
                   Great professor.  Really gets you into the class.  Is you dont like talking that much. He will bring you in from the back row.  Great lec and easy to follow. Uses book but gives a good notes to go by(even if you dont read)
                
                   AWESOME! This is one of the best professors that I have ever encountered! Its hard to believe that someone of this quality actually teaches in south Texas! You will not be disappointed with this professor!
                
                   Great professor! This professor taught me a great deal about speech -- and life. I would definitely admonish people to take his classes (especially the critical thinking classes). Good stuff!
                
                   This guy is a GREAT professor!  I think that I learned more from his class than any others -- and I am not a COM major!  I would definitely recommend his class!
                
                   Great professor!  Clear and very intelligent! One of the best on campus!!!  ***** Recommended!!!
                
                   Great professor!  Worth taking again!  I learned alot, and his class was not difficult.  He teaches in a clear and entertaining way!
                
                   Great prof!
                
                   Easy professor. You do 3 presentations and they are, introduction of yourself, to inform, & to persuade. All your work is online and is all due at the end of the semester. There are NO TESTS AND NO FINAL EXAM. Take him if you want to get an A.
                
                   He doesn't make it mandatory attendance for regular days only for presentation days. his class is an easy day. i never used the book
                
                   Very helpfull teacher, just do 3 presentations. Ur guaranteed to pass the class if u do the presentations and online work that is due at the end of the semester!! I recommend him to anyone.
                
                   It was pretty easy. He takes attendance. He offers extra credit. You had to do several speeches, including a group presentation. You had to write some essays but there very easy.
                
                   Mrs. Gonzalez is probably the best CSDO professor at TAMUK. She makes sure her students grasp the material and is as clear as possible. She makes you work for your grade, but only because she wants you to be successful in the field. So READ! She provides useful material that can/will be used in SLP. I wish I could take every CSDO class with her!
                
                   Awesome teacher, realizes that her class isnt the only one you are taking. Likes to talk with you about classes you are taking. Very attractive
                
                   She is a great proffesor very helpful gives you everything and  takes the time to explain all the material unlike other proffesors.There is no way you cannot pass her class with an A.
                
                   She pretty much hands you the material on a silver platter. This class is pretty much a joke and you'd have to be an idiot not to get a &quot;A&quot; let alone pass. However, she's extremely unprofessional and she's constantly reminding you she's handing you all the material like it's our fault. She's contradictive in a lot of the rules she uses.
                
                   Apparently this was her first year of teaching, and she did an awesome job! I would take her again if she taught more courses. Very helpful, and she does everything she can for her students to understand the material.
                
                   Whitmore is great!  If you attend the classes and study your notes, you'll be fine.  He's a great help if you have any problems!  Highly recomended.
                
                   Eh, this guy is a pushover.  Just dont be an ****, pay attention in class, and you will get A's in his classes.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Prof. Wheeless is GREAT! She's super nice and cares deeply for her students. She tells you exactly what is on her exams and even goes over the review answers. People take advantage of her attendance policy, but it is to your advantage to attend class regularly! The only con is you have to review &quot;quizzes&quot; everyday in class-not  for a grade though.
                
                   DOWN TO EARTH PROF WITH FUN ATTITUDE. HE TAKES TEACHING VERY SERIOUS AND WANTS YOU TO LEARN. SOME ASSIGNMENTS ARE LENGTHY BUT MANAGEABLE. MUST ATTEND CLASSES AND WORK TO GET GRADE
                
                   Dr. Wahl is a power point man, and hands out the copies of his lectures, gives great reviews, and has review sessions before the tests. I really enjoyed going to his class to learn from what he had to say. He really knows his stuff, and wants to see everyone succeed.
                
                   Love this professor! He is a true educator! He is nice, fair, makes things VERY understandable. He is the best secret on campus.  If you get a chance to take him you had better do it...or you will be sorry......THE BONUS IS!!!! YOU WILL LEARN SOMETHING FROM DR. WAHL IF YOU COME TO CLASS AND LISTEN. WILL TAKE HIM FOR EVERY SINGLE CLASS OFERED.
                
                   Easiest A ever! I took him during the summer and he made us get into grps. We each covered a chpt. from the group. We did an easy pr case. His tests are SUPER easy. I'd take him again in a heartbeat.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   HEavy Research based class but easiest A i ever received. Work oen weekend on his stuff aloen and you will eb set for semester
                
                   Dr. Wahl is great.  He is one of the best profs I have ever had.  He is also SO cute.
                
                   One of the best on campus.
                
                   He is a caring teacher.
                
                   He gets kind of weird and emotional at times, but he's a good teacher. His reviews make it easy to get an A.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Hate the class, he read off a power point and made a great topic seems BORING. UGG
                
                   Edward Tyndall is the perfect professor if you are trying to get a degree in film. He lets you get hands on with everything when it comes to camera, lighting, sound etc. I have taken every single Tyndall class (5) and every one of them, I have taken something from the classes and have applied them to everyday life. Thanks Tyndall!
                
                   he is awesome, knowledgeable, and helpful. too bad more teachers arent that way
                
                   he is such a cool guy in editing which threw me off compared to how he was in VP. lessons are easy to follow in FCP book. he grades somewhat hard on the scenes you edit. he said mine was one of the better ones so i was expecting a higher grade - it seems like nothing is &quot;high A&quot; quality.
                
                   there is barely any hands-on exp. bc the advanced class uses the equip. tests are hard so SERIOUSLY study & understand it. book is only needed for tests so share with a friend if you can. he's supposed to change it up next semester (Fall 2011). i didn't like him at all in VP but he's SOO awesome in editing so if you're interested - def take it!
                
                   He is super fun
                
                   Pretty easy class, she was very energetic and talks a lot. 
                
                   easy to understand and easy to listen to. I would take this class again.
                
                   She is a great professor. I would advise everyone to take her. When you take her class, there is a lot of work. Don't worry about it though. It is nothing too overwhelming. I do believe we can use what she taught for the rest of our lives. When you ask questions, be prepared for her and her GA's to say "Go look on Blackboard" Over all, good class. 
                
                   Real life stories keep interest. Skills like she says will last a lifetime if applied. Good prof.
                
                   Ive taken a few with her. The small group was the most fun. She was very helpful and willing to work with anyone who needed help or advise. I would for sure recommend her to those who havent taken her. test were very straight forward nothing too crazy.
                
                   Spaniol is awesome! If you want to become a better communicator take her. If you want a easy A you better take somebody else!
                
                   The best time to take this class is in the summer. There is online homework, but it's easy and not as boring as other online homework platforms. Classes usually end early and this past summer session we didn't have a midterm or final. She is a tough grader on the speeches, but she is very clear on how you can succeed.
                
                   This was a huge class that broke down into small groups.  At the beginning I loathed public speaking, but now I am more confident thanks to this class.  The small classes become very close.
                
                   This public speaking class is very large, so it is split into sub-groups with a variety of grad students. Work is very easy and fun. She posts videos of herself lecturing over topics as well. Good & easy class!
                
                   I suggest taking her class in the summer - she knows what shes talking about. easy class.
                
                   She was friendly and very approachble, she makes you feel like you are doing awsome in class but then you check your grade online and your sinking. Her grading I did not feel was consistent. Very professional.
                
                   I registered for the class fall '08 but ended up dropping due to the fact that I was taking multiple science courses with no time to prepare for speeches. Her lectures were funny and very helpful though. I ended up taking it in the summer with Luna which is way more easier but very fast-paced.
                
                   I took this class over the summer so she personally graded all of our speeches, not a TA, which is why it was difficult. Hard grader! But super nice personality and very helpful. Also, extra credit is available, which is almost the only way to get an A. Glad I got this professor!
                
                   Talks a lot about credibility but ruins it by opening quizzes for slackers. She never went over the syllabus so most of the time I was lost. My TA did the best they could do by trying to explain but wasn't enough lab time to do that. In lecture, all she did was show videos and passed out surveys. Padding the grades by massive points helps ALOT.
                
                   Great Professor! uses TAs and is an easy class! I highly recommend, just follow the syllabus and guidelines and you should get an A!
                
                   There were online quizes for each chapter pretty easy got to use the book. She is super nice, and had TAs that you were split up in and gave your speeches in a smaller group. I actually enjoyed her class and thought she was an awesome teacher. I definitely recommend her to anyone, btw I got an A in the class.
                
                   Summer class was small, so no use of TAs. Very upbeat and loves to tell real life stories and use YouTube to illustrate her point. Great at letting the class out early but always says to use this time wisely and that she is available to brainstorm with you and help. Grades the speeches hard, but fair and leaves a lot of feedback. Ended with an 'A'
                
                   Very nice teacher. Grades a little tough. She made the class pretty interesting. I got a A but did it w/ A LOT of practicing before we had to do our speeches in class.
                
                   Fairly easy class. She can be hard at grading but she will leave constructive criticism so that you know what to do for the next speech. I got a B on the first assignment but I worked on my weaknesses ended up with high A's on the last two assignments. I did this class over the summer, so I don't know what it's like during the Fall or Spring.
                
                   She uses TA's as buffers and I happened to get stuck with one that didn't know a damn thing.
                
                   Uses many examples to reinforce her lectures. Simple reading quizzes and easy to study for tests.
                
                   Tests are somewhat difficult but you will pass only if you study whatever is on the review. Because of what the class is about, expect a lot of group work. She gives one huge group project with a few group papers and a couple of individual papers. She is very helpful and always welcomes questions. She is a great prof, take her classes.
                
                   Class is so much fun but you will work for your grade!! Tests aren't easy, you have to study, so study the review! There are three application essays and one analysis paper. Rollie is a great prof, you will walk away having learned a lot.
                
                   At first she comes off to be a hard as* but after awhile you get very use to her. I actually enjoyed going to her classes, she always made me laugh.  I thought she was very approachable, she's willing to answer all questions after class. I thought her class was very manageable, it was two hrs, 1 time a week & she gives you a break in between :)
                
                   I have to agree with the previous comment.  She takes public speaking way to seriously and she is also a very hard grader.  If I could avoid it, I wouldn't take her
                
                   I would not recommend taking her public speaking class. She is very strict and takes public speaking way too serious. She only teaches night classes. She is not an understanding professor what so ever
                
                   She was easily one of my favorite professors! She's incredibly nice and understanding. If you miss a class, as long as you let her know what's going on, it won't count against you. She's a fair grader and is more than willing to assist with anything that you aren't understanding. I definitely recommend her!
                
                   She is THE BEST
                
                   She tries very hard to make the class fun and interesting for students.  She expects you to do work, and is really straight-forward about what she wants on assignments and what will be covered on tests.  She's really helpful and welcoming to students.  The subject matter of some of her classes is hellaboring, but she's a great professor overall.
                
                   she was a great teacher, lots of group work though since we made a Crisis Plan for a Orginization. She was super helpful and really fun to be in class with.
                
                   Dr. Maresh makes learning PR fun & interesting.  She has tons of examples from her research and personal experiences and current examples.  She helped me land my first PR job and I feel like I am good at it because of what I learned in her classes.
                
                   Really nice and SUPER easy A, but not very organized. It would be more effective to study PR with someone who has practical experience in the field. She knows the theories and text book stuff, just doesn't have real world examples and stories to share.
                
                   Michelle is great! She makes class so fun and keeps it entertaining!! She uses current material to help you understand the lessons and everyone in the class LOVES her!! DEFINITELY RECOMMEND!!
                
                   Took him for Senior Seminar and it was one of the hardest classes I've ever taken in my whole college career. I expect it to be difficult, but WOW! He is helpful and gives GREAT feedback, but the class was hard and very confusing. 
                
                   I'd highly recommend his film studies courses. He doesn't stick to screening typical film school movies like Citizen Kane and Vertigo. He also examines the cinematic language of modern day films like Drive and Reservoir Dogs. His courses are writing-intensive and he seems to grade much of the work based on the originality of the student's ideas.
                
                   In my opinion, he is extremely monotone and boring.  To me, his slides are useless when it comes to preparing for his essay tests and his project instruction are frustratingly vague.  He did not use a textbook, readings were online. I won't take a class from him again. Freshmen beware.
                
                   He uses lots of interesting examples and is really easy to talk to outside class. The assignments are pretty cool too.
                
                   He makes class really fun and interesting. He can be a tough grader but he also gives extra credit sometimes too. Good film screenings, except for Beeswax.
                
                   Fun, interesting. Keeps it laid back and simple. Great with test reviews!
                
                   He is hard to understand sometimes. All he does is read of his PowerPoint slides which are as hard to understand as him.
                
                   scores in strictly; class boring
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He is a great teacher. The key to getting an A is showing up for every class on time and that is about it!
                
                   If you come to class everyday its easy. If you don't it's twice as hard
                
                   Easy class.  Just show up every day and you are guarenteed an A.  No outside work or homework.  Great teacher, and just plain easy.
                
                   I took his Film and Culture class and he is awesome! Very willing to hear everyone's opinion. Great professor!
                
                   Can't say enough good things about Dr. B. He is funny and has a great passion for what he teaches- you can tell by the way he lectures. He uses Powerpoints for lectures (talking points) but moves fast, so write quickly. Loves hearing from students in class and in office hours. Weekly quizzes are given, and a few essays. The book is essential.
                
                   he brings great knowledge and understanding! 
                
                   Highly effectual teacher, fun lectures. He very clearly has an understanding of what he's teaching and is very passionate about the subject. He respects students that participate and even gives high marks to students who speak out.
                
                   Seriously, one of the best professors I've had! Keeps the class very engaged in lecture with funny stories from his experiances. Quizzes are every week, but they are not hard if you pay attention, know current news, and read the book. Although I'm not a communications major, he is great to take and learn from whether you're a major in comm or not.
                
                   A&M-Corpus Christi is SO fortunate to have Mr. Babbili. He is extremely talented, intelligent, kind and has many, many years professional experience in journalism and communication. He has so many great stories to share during class, making his lectures about text book material so much easier to understand. I respect and admire this man very much.
                
                   This is easily the best teacher at TAMUCC. You cant fail his class if you show up everyday and you become aware of what is going on around you. If I was staying at TAMUCC I'd take him for any other courses I needed
                
                   Best professor I've ever had, as either an undergraduate or graduate student.
                
                   Awesome Professor! Chapter quizes every week are a breeze only requiring a read through of it the night before. Very educated/experienced in the communications field.
                
                   He is such a great Professor! Media is his passion and it is contageous! He loves to get the class involved and makes class fun! You have a news quiz and a test every week. It is very difficult to make a bad grade if you come to class, listen and take good notes!
                
                   Took Dr. Babbili for Media and Society, and has to be the best class I've taken so far! He's AWESOME! He knows his stuff and always makes class fun and interesting! He keeps you up to date on everything news. I recommend him 100%!
                
                   Its very hard to fail his class because he gives chapter/lecture quizzes and current event/media quizzes every week. He only gives two papers, 4-5 pages each over a media related topic. No other exams, except for final. His lectures are interesting and helpful. No power-points just whiteboard so try to take good notes.
                
                   MY FAVORITE TEACHER! he is so awesome because he tells you stories that are actually interesting & keeps you up to date with world news. take any & every class you can with him! books: borrow a friends if you can for when you need them. legal&ethical - don't need them just google the case(s) he gives you & media&society you'll need it for a paper
                
                   I took the class online and it was simple. Submit your short discussion post by Friday and answer two other students. There are 2 papers, but they short. You need to keep & read all the notes he gives for the test in order to pass. I made a 88.9 at the end of the semester & begged for extra credit. He let me & I made an A
                
                   Expect 4 or more speeches to be due through out the semester.
                
                   Dr. Tarvin was definitely my favorite professor this semester. Always helps you if you seek help. Attend his office hours for help on your speeches and you should get a high b or low a on your speeches.
                
                   Tarvin is a hilarious and excitable instructor that really makes you want to learn more about the material. He explains material very well and even though I thought I understood everything perfectly, his tests still challenged me and I only made a B in the class. Despite this, he is still my favorite professor I took this semester.
                
                   Tarvin is awesome. He's hilarious, he's informative, he's really there to help his students and is genuinely interested in the stuff he's teaching. This class was super fun to take. His tests are difficult and you'll want to study for them, but the study material is made easily available. 
                
                   Fantastic professor. Very knowledgeable and genuinely wants to help students. Grades pretty hard on speeches but lets you know all of  the ways to improve and by the end of the semester, you are doing great on your speeches. Keeps the class interesting and fun. One of the best professors I have taken at A&M. 
                
                   In high school, I won most of my scholarships off of speeches and, as such, expected to earn an easy A in this class. It wasn't. I was borderline BC and only got a B because of the final. However, even though I'm barely a Sophomore, he's my favorite professor by far. Extremely helpful and I'd HIGHLY recommend to all.
                
                   Comprised of 4 speeches. He is a tough grader at first but gets more lenient every speech. You only have to take the final if it helps your grade. It may not look like it but he is very intelligent and knows his stuff, so trying to outsmart him is a no no. 
                
                   Great professor, love his sense of humor, fun class. He expects a lot from you in your speeches. If you're looking for an easy A, this class isn't for you. Others have always told me I was a great speaker. I was president of FFA for 2yrs in a row and had given many speeches before, often being complimented on them after. I got a B in his class. 
                
                   Dr. Tarvin easily became one of my favorite professors. He is young, fresh, educated, and a fantastic lecturer. He was always there when I needed him and he would always provide awesome feedback when I had a question. He legitimately cares about your grade and wants you to succeed. Tarvin is the man. 
                
                   Dave is a cool cat!! His class is very interesting, and he always tells interesting stories.
                
                   Lectures are short, and to the point and never more than 45 min. Tests are the easiest thing in the world, 99% lecture and 1% book.
                
                   Dr. Sumpter is truly a very thorough and helpful professor. I have him on Tuesday's and Thursday's but his lectures are rarely over an hour in length. He gives you the exact information you will need for your tests along with bringing in historical artifacts that pertain to the lecture that day. He does like class discussion, so speak up.   
                
                   The worst professor I have EVER had. He's truly useless- he's somehow the Director of the Journalism department, which is why it's completely failing. He is always completely unprepared for class, you can tell he makes up assignments on a whim. He's also incredibly condescening and rude.
                
                   Jon is the best professor I've had so far. He is so patient and willing to work with everyone at every step in the class. He understands students' problems and helps them overcome them.
                
                   Love, love, love this professor and his class! I wish I could take it again becaue I enjoyed it so much. Take it honors if you can, it's so easy and I learned so much that I use in other classes and the workplace!
                
                   Great professor!  Dr. Ritter really knows his stuff and is very good at helping his student's prepare their speeches.
                
                   The class was absolutely dreadful. She graded like we were grad students. Going to her office doesn't help, she just says things to blow you off and leave as soon as possible. I made a 76 in her class and worked extremely hard. The average letter grade was definitely a C. Tests are ridiculous and you only have 2. All written exams.
                
                   Srivi was so helpful. She was passionate about what she was teaching. She would send out weekly reminders of what needed to be done for the week and she gave us exact questions to review before the exam. She genuinely cares about her students and I love her class. You will work hard but if you attend class, it's not bad.
                
                   To get an A on her tests, memorize the notes word for word. She is not difficult, but it is not an interesting class either. She is sometimes hard to understand, and she did not make me develop a love for my major, communication. But it's not terrible difficult. She gives group tests, which boost your grade but are dumb.
                
                   Professor Poirot was amazing! I took Honors Public Speaking, a service-learning based class, and had the best time. 
                
                   You have a quiz or a critical response (2 page paper) every week. They are really hard, but they're worth almost nothing. Then you have one speech and 3 debates. If you're not incompetent at putting your thoughts into words, you should be good. He likes people who have strong opinions. He's funny, but can be pretentious and condescending at times.
                
                   I got a B in this course, and it's very straightforward. You attend the course, write the notes, and read the material, not hard to get an A.   
                
                   Good instructor overall. She is obviously liberal, it comes out in her class discussions and readings. However, she is open to debate and does not grade people lower for not agreeing with her views. I did note that she would sometimes make claims that simply were not true, such as 10% of Americans are in prison. Not a bad class overall.
                
                   Communist. One of those out to "cure" Texas A&M and our backwards ways.
                
                   I love this Professor! She is such a joy. So bubbly and nice! Though, I will say, if you take her class be prepared to come to class everyday. Though attendance isn't mandatory, her notes and lecture are intensive. Bring a laptop if you can and be prepared to write ALOT of notes. Ive only taken her midterm, but I made a B. Would take her again. :)
                
                   I feel bad giving her a mediocre grade on difficulty, because although her &quot;difficulty&quot; score is a little low, I'm fairly certain the people grading her this way are the same unconcerned students incessantly chatting it up around me during her lecture, making it difficult to even hear--much less focus on--what she's saying. She's very friendly and between her and the TA's, they welcome questions, so it's not hard to get things clarified that you don't understand. You'd have to really not be taking the class seriously enough to get anything lower than a B, and an A is very do-able.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He was a cool professor!! The lectures aren't bad, and he's young so he isn't intimidating. Their are 2 parts of the tests, individual portion (10 questions) and a group portion (20 questions and 5 short answer). Big group project at end of semester that requires a lot of out of meeting wt your group, not hard as long as you have a good group!
                
                   As the name implies, you'll be doing a large group project, so make sure you choose your group members wisely. He's a critical grader but his rubrics are pretty comprehensive so stick to those. You take the tests in groups, so as long as you work well with your group, an A is achievable without much work. 
                
                   He tries to make classes fun and interactive.  Really enjoyed having him as a teacher.
                
                   Nice guy like everyone says. I wish he had tried to engage the class more during lectures, that way I could be sure I was understanding the material, especially with his thick accent.  Midterm, final, 10  quizzes, and 12 freebie 100 labs. Does give reviews, yet those would sometimes be confusing and different from the what appeared on tests.
                
                   Really nice guy. Hard to grasp what he wants you to know from his lectures. Quizzes and a lab due every week. Quizzes are hard because you aren't exactly sure what he wants you to know, and sometimes the questions weren't gone over in class or in the textbook readings. Not hard to get a B because if you do the labs is basically a guaranteed 100.
                
                   Labs every week, quite every wee, hard to understand, quizzes never make sense, nice enough guy, but this class makes your work for it
                
                   I really like Dr. Campbell. This class was interesting as well as fun. The tests were pretty fair. She offers extra credit opportunities to go on your final grade. I would sometimes get distracted though because her voice sounds EXACTLY like ellen degeneres. I would def take another class with her.
                
                   He is a really awesome professor. I really enjoyed him. If you participate in class he tells you that he will even bump up your grade up a few points in the end. You have to read a lot and the only grades are test So if you suck at test taking then don't take him. You will end up failing. I am hope to get a B in this class. 
                
                   There was so much information for this course. He did not use a textbook, only online articles. There were a lot of them, though, and pretty necessary for tests. He really tried to work with us and asked for our feedback all the time. He was a great speaker and VERY smart, but it was a hard course.
                
                   I took his interpersonal communication class this fall. We barely used the book. We definitely did not follow the syllabus at all. He is a nice person and easily approachable, but I do not feel that I learned anything. As long as you show up and do what is asked you'll be fine. Beware of group projects!!
                
                   I took his class on-line.  It was very easy as long as you did the work required.  However, he was VERY contradictory with his instructions.  He also obviously did not actually grade anything.  He gave absolutely zero legitimate feedback.  It also took him a very long time to give any grades back.  Take his class if you want an A, not to learn.
                
                   Fun class - when we met face to face. Is he still married&#63;
                
                   Okay, the semester is over and I can post this with clarity. Mr. Loyd is a very good teacher and cares about his students. You know when he likes you because he challenges you more than the other students. He doesn't pick favorites...I enjoyed his class and learned what I needed. The best part was that he taught us what we needed to know...Take him
                
                   This guy failed me because I challenged him. There was no need to go to his class b/c he's boring. Atleast his tests weren't hard.
                
                   I think this guy has too much on his plate...he cares about what we learn and us, but it just seems he doesn't have time to complete his ideas. He's fun and I got a lot out of the class...but I think he can do better. TAKE HIS CLASSES - IT'S FUN
                
                   It took him a while to get started...something about we have understand content&#63; Anyway - He is moving along now. He's a nice guy. Young (and cute) but focused. He knows his stuff and goes out of his way so that you do too. He makes sense of it all. It's a shame he's only an adjunct...we could use more profs like him!  :)
                
                   I thought this class was going to be tough after the first meeting. It's not the easiest class in the world, but Loyd does a good job. It takes him a while to get going occassionally, but once he does it's great. Take him - you'll learn something and have fun!
                
                   She is a really nice person and a great advisor. Really personable. If you're having trouble let her know & she'll help you. She's not the best professor out there but if you make an effort in her classes u will pass
                
                   She is great. If you do what is asked of you there is no way you won't pass.
                
                   an amazing teacher. generally teaches honors classes, you have to work hard in his classes but it's worth it. very friendly and interested in his students! wonderful man and wonderful teacher!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dean of the Graduate School and of the Honors Program, incredibly nice and helpful, absolutely committed to his students, if he wasn't so imposing a figure you might forget he was a teacher (a Dean, even!) and think he was a friend.
                
                   She was wonderful and Such a sweet heart! Willing to help anytime and anyone. She is kind hearted and very caring. Really wants her students to do well. Makes doing a speech not so scary and gives extra credit opportunities! I strongly suggest taking her class!
                
                   AMAZING.  Super easy class but you really do learn a lot.  Makes you really comfortable.  Offers TONS of extra credit and even let us do corrections on our tests. You will not regret taking her class.
                